Utah statutes.
32A-4a-402 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Operational restrictions for a sublicense.
(1)  A person operating under a sublicense is subject to the operational
restrictions under the provisions applicable to the sublicense except that,
notwithstanding a requirement in the provisions applicable to the sublicense,
a person operating under the sublicense is not subject to a requirement that a
certain percentage of the gross receipts for the sublicense be from the sale
of food, except to the extent that the gross receipts for the sublicense are
included in calculating the percentages under Subsection 32A-4a-401(10).
(2)  Subject to Section 32A-4a-502, for purposes of interpreting an
operational restriction imposed by the provisions applicable to a sublicense:
(a)  a requirement imposed on a person operating under a sublicense applies to
the resort licensee; and
(b)  a requirement imposed on an employee or agent of a person operating under
a sublicense applies to an employee or agent of the resort licensee.
